Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB754.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 30(b)(1) of the act of August 31, 1971 (P.L.398, No.96), known as the County Pension Law, is amended to read:Section 30. Supplemental Benefits.--* * *(b) (1) The cost-of-living increase shall be reviewed at least once in every three years by the board which may adjust the current monthly benefit by up to, but no more than, the percentages in accordance with cost-of-living index at the time of review, provided that the adjustment need not be calculated retroactively to the date of the previous cost-of-living increase approved by the board under this section and need not apply the cost-of-living index change for each year since the 12345678910111213141516171819 previous cost-of-living increase. Any adjustment approved under this paragraph shall become effective January 1 of the calendar year following the year in which the adjustment is approved.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0754PN0778 - 2 - 12345